Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.110

Penalty for failure to deliver certificates.

Any person solemnizing a marriage, who shall wilfully refuse or neglect to make and deliver to the county auditor for record, the certificates mentioned in RCW 26.04.090, within the time in such section specified, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall pay for such refusal, or neglect, a fine of not less than twenty-five nor more than three hundred dollars.

[ 1967 c 26 s 6; 1947 c 59 s 3; 1886 p 66 s 2; Code 1881 s 2387; 1866 p 83 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8447.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 c 26: See note following RCW 43.70.150.